Tennessee, session 114, SB1602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-101(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-101(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) It is a Class D felony for any person to fail to stop or to comply with the
requirements of subsection (a) when the person knew or should reasonably have known
that death resulted from the accident.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1602
010248
- 1 -